Utah statutes.
63G-6a-204.   Applicability of rules and regulations of Utah State Procurement Policy Board and State Building Board -- Report to interim committee.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), rules made by the board under this chapter shall govern all procurement units for which the board is the applicable rulemaking authority.

(2)  The building board rules governing procurement of construction, architect-engineer services, and leases apply to the procurement of construction, architect-engineer services, and leases of real property by the Division of Facilities Construction and Management.

(3)  An applicable rulemaking authority may make its own rules, consistent with this chapter, governing procurement by a person over which the applicable rulemaking authority has rulemaking authority.

(4)  The board shall make a report on or before July 1 of each year to a legislative interim committee, designated by the Legislative Management Committee created under Section 36-12-6, on the establishment, implementation, and enforcement of the rules made under Section 63G-6a-203.

(5)  Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-3-301(13)(b), an applicable rulemaking authority is, on or before May 13, 2014, required to initiate rulemaking proceedings for rules required to be made under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

